Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201276-3301
Act, how cited.

Sections
76-3301 to 76-3308 shall be known and
may be cited as the Oil Pipeline Reclamation Act.

Laws 2011, LB629, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB845, § 1.